Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Operator’s License
186.442.
Suspension or revocation of license or driving privileges in another jurisdiction — Persons eligible for restricted license — Application and supporting documents — Issuance of license valid only in Kentucky — Removal of restrictions — Inapplicability to commercial driver’s license.

The Transportation Cabinet shall, before issuing or renewing a Kentucky operator’s license, verify through the National Drivers Register that the person applying for an initial or renewal Kentucky operator’s license does not currently have his or her operator’s license or driving privilege suspended or revoked in another licensing jurisdiction.

If the person’s operator’s license or driving privilege is currently suspended or revoked in another licensing jurisdiction for a traffic offense where the conviction for the offense is less than five (5) years old, the Transportation Cabinet shall not issue the person an initial or renewal Kentucky operator’s license until the person resolves the matter in the other licensing jurisdiction and complies with the provisions of this chapter.

A person whose operator’s license has been suspended or revoked in another licensing jurisdiction, or the holder of a Kentucky operator’s license whose driving privileges have been suspended in another licensing jurisdiction, may be issued a Kentucky license, or may renew a Kentucky license if:

The conviction causing the suspension or revocation is more than five (5) years old;

The conviction is for a traffic offense other than a felony traffic offense or a habitual violator offense; and

The person has been a resident of the Commonwealth for at least five (5) years prior to the date of application for issuance or renewal.

A person applying for an operator’s license under subsection (3) of this section shall submit an application to the cabinet, who shall electronically scan the application and supporting documents, along with a photograph of the applicant captured in accordance with KRS 186.4102(1), into the cabinet database.

The cabinet shall review the person’s documentation, including the person’s photograph, in the cabinet database. If the documentation is verified as accurate, and if the person successfully completes any examinations required under KRS

186.480

and pays the reinstatement fee required under KRS

186.531

, the cabinet shall present the applicant with a temporary operator’s license, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days, until a permanent operator’s license is mailed to the applicant by the Transportation Cabinet.

A person issued a Kentucky operator’s license in accordance with subsection (3) of this section shall be issued an operator’s license marked “Valid in Kentucky Only” and shall sign a statement that the person understands that he or she may be subject to arrest and detention if stopped by a law enforcement officer in another state while operating a motor vehicle on this restricted license.

If a person granted a license under subsection (3) of this section satisfies the requirements to have the suspension or revocation in another state lifted, the person shall apply to the cabinet to be issued a new license without the restrictions outlined in subsection (3) of this section.

The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall not apply to a commercial driver’s license.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 189, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2017 ch. 100, § 17, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 14, effective March 27, 2020.

186.444.
Medical review board — Purpose — Members — Informal hearing — Authority of cabinet to promulgate administrative regulations — Prohibition against age-based licensing limitations — Appeal.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish a medical review board. The purpose of the medical review board shall be to receive cases relating to the ability of an applicant or holder of a motor vehicle operator’s license to drive due to physical or mental disability which may affect or limit a person’s ability to safely operate a motor vehicle.

The secretary shall appoint any number of physicians licensed in the Commonwealth to the medical review board. Not less than three (3) members shall be present in order to conduct an informal hearing. Each member shall receive two hundred dollars ($200) per day for attending meetings of the board and shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations regarding the procedures of the medical review board in conducting informal hearings.

The cabinet shall not promulgate administrative regulations for the purpose of creating tests or other criteria that might limit a person’s ability to obtain or retain an operator’s license because that person may be considered too old to drive.

Any person aggrieved by a decision made as a result of an informal hearing conducted under authority of KRS

186.411

and this section may appeal, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 455, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 71, effective July 15, 1996; 2020 ch. 51, § 15, effective March 27, 2020.

186.445.
License for child to operate motor vehicle of not more than five horsepower. [Repealed.]

186.447.
Motorcycle operator's license restriction — Three-wheeled motorcycles.

The Transportation Cabinet shall establish a restriction on motorcycle operator’s licenses which limits the operator to the operation of a three (3) wheeled motorcycle only.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 188, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

186.450.
Instruction permits for motor vehicle and motorcycle — Application — Age requirements — Restrictions on driving with permit — Administrative regulations — Minors and adults who assume responsibility for them.

A person who is at least sixteen (16) years of age may apply for an instruction permit to operate a motor vehicle. A person who possesses a valid intermediate motor vehicle operator’s license issued under KRS

186.452

or a person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age may apply for an instruction permit to operate a motorcycle. A holder of either a motor vehicle or motorcycle instruction permit may also operate a moped under that permit. A person applying for an instruction permit under this section shall make application to the Transportation Cabinet. A person applying for an instruction permit shall be required to comply with the following:

If the person is under the age of eighteen (18), the instruction permit application shall be signed by the applicant’s parent or legal guardian. If the person does not have a living parent or does not have a legal guardian, the instruction permit application shall be signed by a person willing to assume responsibility for the applicant pursuant to KRS

186.590

;

If the person is under the age of eighteen (18) and in the custody of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the instruction permit application shall be signed by:

The applicant’s parent, legal guardian, grandparent, adult sibling, aunt, or uncle if the parental rights have not been terminated in accordance with KRS Chapter 625;

The foster parent with whom the applicant resides;

Another person who is at least age eighteen (18) and is willing to assume responsibility for the applicant pursuant to KRS

186.590

; or

The applicant, without another person, upon verification by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in accordance with KRS

605.102

that shall include proof of financial responsibility in accordance with KRS 186.590(2); and

All applicants for an instruction permit shall comply with the examinations required by KRS

186.480

.

If an applicant successfully passes the examinations required by KRS

186.480

, the applicant shall be issued an instruction permit upon payment of the fee set forth in KRS

186.531

.

An instruction permit to operate a motor vehicle shall be valid for three (3) years and may be renewed. An instruction permit to operate a motorcycle shall be valid for one (1) year and may be renewed one (1) time.

Except as provided in KRS

186.415

, a person who has attained the age of sixteen (16) years and is under the age of eighteen (18) years shall have the instruction permit a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days before applying for an intermediate license and shall have an intermediate license for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days before applying for an operator’s license.

A person who was under eighteen (18) years of age at the time of application for an instruction permit and is eighteen (18) years of age or older shall have the instruction permit a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days and complete a driver training program under KRS 186.410(4) before applying for an operator’s license.

A person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age and is under the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time of application for an instruction permit shall have the instruction permit a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days before applying for an operator’s license.

A person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age at the time of application for an instruction permit shall have the instruction permit a minimum of thirty (30) days before applying for an operator’s license.

In accordance with KRS 176.5062(5), a person whose motorcycle instruction permit has expired may apply to the cabinet to receive a motorcycle operator’s license or endorsement if the person presents proof of successful completion of a motorcycle safety education course approved by the Transportation Cabinet under KRS

176.5061

to

176.5069

.

A person shall have the instruction permit in his possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped upon the highway.

When operating a motor vehicle, a motor vehicle instruction permit holder shall be accompanied by a person with a valid operator’s license who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age occupying the seat beside the operator at all times.

The requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection shall not apply to a motor vehicle instruction permit holder being supervised on a multiple-vehicle driving range by a driver training instructor affiliated with a driver training school licensed under KRS Chapter 332 or a public or nonpublic secondary school.

A person with an instruction permit who is under the age of eighteen (18) shall not operate a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped between the hours of 12 midnight and 6 a.m. unless the person can demonstrate good cause for driving, including but not limited to emergencies, involvement in school-related activities, or involvement in work-related activities.

Except when accompanied by a driver training instructor affiliated with a driver training school licensed under KRS Chapter 332 or a public or nonpublic secondary school, a person with an instruction permit who is under the age of eighteen (18) years shall not operate a motor vehicle at any time when accompanied by more than one (1) unrelated person who is under the age of twenty (20) years. A peace officer shall not stop or seize a person nor issue a uniform citation for a violation of this subsection if the officer has no other cause to stop or seize the person other than a violation of this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to any operator of a vehicle registered under the provisions of KRS 186.050(4) who is engaged in agricultural activities.

A violation under subsection (4), (5), or (6) of this section, a conviction for a moving violation under KRS Chapter 189 for which points are assessed by the cabinet, or a conviction for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1) shall add an additional minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of the violation before a person who is under the age of eighteen (18) years may apply for an intermediate license to operate a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped.

A person under the age of eighteen (18) who accumulates more than six (6) points against his driving privilege may have the driving privilege suspended pursuant to KRS Chapter 186 or probated by the court.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, to establish procedures for:

Minors who reside with individuals in informal guardianship arrangements to have an adult who resides with them sign the minor’s application and assume responsibility in accordance with subsection (1) of this section;

Individuals who have signed for responsibility under subsection (1) of this section to rescind that assumption of responsibility;

Notifying minors when an adult has rescinded responsibility under subsection (1) of this section; and

Allowing minors for whom an adult has rescinded responsibility under subsection (1) of this section, to obtain a new signature of an individual assuming responsibility without having to retake any examinations the minor has successfully passed.

History.

2739m-39: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 127, § 3; 1958, ch. 60, § 4; 1970, ch. 22, § 3; 1978, ch. 349, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 266, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 99, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 123, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 234, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 503, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 198, § 2, effective October 1, 1996; 1998, ch. 52, § 2, effective March 16, 1998; 2001, ch. 43, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2006, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 46, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 16, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 79, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 11, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 100, § 18, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 16, effective March 27, 2020; 2021 ch. 190, § 10, § 17, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 190, secs. 10 and 17, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(7/12/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 65, sec, 9, provides: “The amendments to Section 1 of this Act (this statute) shall apply to any person who obtains an original or renewal instruction permit pursuant to
KRS

186.450

on or after October 1, 2006.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

It would seem that the intention of this section is not being fulfilled where the licensed driver is intoxicated at the time he is in the car with a driver operating with an instruction permit.

OAG 72-238

.

An Indiana resident, under a valid instruction permit from Indiana, may take driver’s education training at a Kentucky high school.

OAG 74-739

.

The requirements of Acts 1990, ch. 234 (KRS

159.051

,

186.470

and this section) that applicants for driving permits and operator’s licenses who are under the age of 18 and who have not graduated from high school provide proof that they are currently enrolled or have been enrolled in the prior semester of school may be implemented immediately if it is limited to requiring the applicants to provide this proof based only on whether the applicants have withdrawn from school; requiring the applicants to provide proof of enrollment based on whether the applicants have “dropped out” of school as defined in Section 1(1) of the Act (KRS

159.051

) should not be implemented immediately, because such immediate implementation would cause the Act to be applied retroactively without statutory authorization. In addition, the Act’s requirement that these applicants provide proof that they are not or have not been found academically deficient should not be implemented immediately, because such immediate implementation would cause the Act to be applied retroactively without statutory authorization; those requirements of the Act which will not be implemented immediately should be implemented at any future date in which the “preceding semester” referred to in the Act will have occurred after July 13, 1990.

OAG 90-54

.

186.452.
Intermediate license to operate a motor vehicle.

Except as provided in KRS

186.415

, a person who is under eighteen (18) years of age may apply for an intermediate license to operate a motor vehicle if the person has:

Held an instruction permit a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days without a violation under KRS 186.450(4), (5), or (6), a conviction for a violation of KRS

189.292

or

189.294

, a conviction for a moving violation under KRS Chapter 189 for which points are assessed by the cabinet, or a conviction for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1); and

Presented a statement to the Department of Kentucky State Police signed by a parent or guardian of the applicant attesting that the applicant has completed at least sixty (60) hours of supervised driving experience, including at least ten (10) hours at night, while accompanied by a person who has attained the age of twenty-one (21) years and holds a valid operator’s license occupying the seat beside the applicant.

If an applicant for an intermediate license successfully completes the examinations required under KRS

186.480

, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall affix an intermediate license sticker to the instruction permit and report the applicant’s new status to the Transportation Cabinet. The Transportation Cabinet shall update the information in its computer system to reflect that the applicant has been granted an intermediate license. An intermediate license shall be valid for two (2) years and may be renewed.

A person shall have the intermediate license in his or her possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle.

A person with an intermediate license who is under the age of eighteen (18) years shall not operate a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped between the hours of 12 midnight and 6 a.m. unless the person can demonstrate good cause for driving, including emergencies, involvement in school-related activities, or involvement in work-related activities.

Except when accompanied by a driver training instructor affiliated with a driver training school licensed under KRS Chapter 332 or a public or nonpublic secondary school, a person with an intermediate license who is under the age of eighteen (18) years shall not operate a motor vehicle at any time when accompanied by more than one (1) unrelated person who is under the age of twenty (20) years. A peace officer shall not stop or seize a person nor issue a uniform citation for a violation of this subsection if the officer has no other cause to stop or seize the person other than a violation of this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to any operator of a vehicle registered under the provisions of KRS 186.050(4) who is engaged in agricultural activities.

A violation under subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this section, a conviction for a moving violation under KRS Chapter 189 for which points are assessed by the cabinet, or a conviction for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1) shall add an additional minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of the violation before a person who is under the age of eighteen (18) years may apply for an operator’s license.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 194, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 46, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 110, § 5, effective July 15, 2010.

186.454.
Intermediate license holder application process.

Except as provided in KRS

186.415

, a person with an intermediate license who is under the age of eighteen (18) years may apply for an operator’s license to operate a motor vehicle if the person has:

Held an intermediate license for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days without a conviction for a moving violation under KRS Chapter 189 for which points are assessed by the cabinet, a conviction for a violation of KRS

189.292

or

189.294

, a conviction for a violation of KRS 189A.010(1), or a conviction under KRS 186.452(3), (4), or (5); and

Completed a driver training program under KRS 186.410(4).

A person with an intermediate license who is eighteen (18) years of age or older may apply for an operator’s license to operate a motor vehicle if the person has completed a driver training program under KRS 186.410(4).

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 65, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 110, § 6, effective July 15, 2010.

186.455.
Circuit clerk’s fees for preparing and acknowledging applications for driver’s instruction permit. [Repealed.]

186.460.
Application for operator’s license or instruction permit — Renewal of license. [Repealed.]

186.470.
Application of minor — Renewal of minor’s license or permit — Consent to release of academic information to cabinet — Cancellation.

Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, the application of any minor under the age of eighteen (18) for an operator’s license, motorcycle operator’s license, intermediate license, or any instruction permit shall not be granted unless the application is signed by a parent or legal guardian of the applicant. Regardless of which parent signs the application, both parents shall be responsible as provided in KRS

186.590

.

The application of a minor who is under the age of eighteen (18) and in the custody of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be signed by:

The applicant’s parent, legal guardian, grandparent, adult sibling, aunt, or uncle if the parental rights have not been terminated in accordance with KRS Chapter 625;

The foster parent with whom the applicant resides;

Another person who is at least age eighteen (18) and is willing to assume responsibility for the applicant pursuant to KRS

186.590

; or

The applicant, without another person, upon verification by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services in accordance with KRS

605.102

that shall include proof of financial responsibility in accordance with KRS 186.590(2).

If the minor does not have a father, mother, or guardian, and has not applied under paragraph (b) of this subsection, an operator’s license, intermediate license, or instruction permit shall not be granted to the minor unless his or her application is signed by a person willing to assume the obligation imposed by KRS 186.590 upon a person signing the application of a minor.

A signature shall not be required in the case of the renewal of a minor’s license but the signature on the original application shall continue to make the parent, guardian, or other person liable under the provisions of KRS 186.590 on all renewals of the minor’s license until he or she reaches the age of eighteen (18) unless the license, or any renewal thereof, is canceled as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The application shall include parental consent or the minor’s consent for the receipt and release of the information as set forth in KRS

159.051

regarding the attendance and academic requirements for a minor to acquire and keep an operator’s license, intermediate license, instructional permit, or privilege to operate a motor vehicle.

A parent or a guardian of a minor applicant, or a person who signed for a minor applicant under subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section, may file with the cabinet a verified written request that the license of the minor be canceled. A minor’s foster parent shall share a request made in accordance with this paragraph with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

A representative of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services may file with the cabinet a verified written request that the license of a minor child in the custody of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services be canceled.

Upon the filing of a request under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, the license of the minor shall be canceled and any person who signed the application shall be relieved as to subsequent acts of the minor from the liability imposed by subsection (1) of KRS

186.590

.

Upon receipt of satisfactory evidence of the death of the person who signed the application of a minor for a license, the cabinet shall have the license canceled and no new license shall be issued to the minor until a new application, signed and verified, is made as required by this section.

HISTORY:

2739m-41: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 127, § 5; 1970, ch. 22, § 4; 1974, ch. 286, § 1; 1974, ch. 386, § 33; 1990, ch. 234, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 503, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 198, § 7, effective October 1, 1996; 2006, ch. 65, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 36, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 11, § 2.

186.480.
Examination of applicants by Department of Kentucky State Police — Exemptions. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall examine every applicant for an operator’s license as identified in KRS

186.635

, except as otherwise provided in this section. The examination shall be held in the county where the applicant resides unless:

The applicant is granted written permission by the Transportation Cabinet to take the examination in another county, and the Department of Kentucky State Police agree to arrange for the examination in the other county; or

The applicant is tested using a bioptic telescopic device.

The examination shall include a test of the applicant’s eyesight to ensure compliance with the visual acuity standards set forth in KRS

186.577

. The examination shall also include a test of the applicant’s ability to read and understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic, the applicant’s knowledge of traffic laws, and an actual demonstration of the applicant’s ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to an applicant who:

At the time of application, holds a valid operator’s license from another state, provided that state affords a reciprocal exemption to a Kentucky resident; or

Is a citizen of the Commonwealth who has been serving in the United States military and has allowed his or her operator’s license to expire.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, an applicant for a motorcycle operator’s license shall be required to show his or her ability to operate a motorcycle. An applicant who successfully completes the skills portion of the test under this subsection on a:

Three (3) wheeled motorcycle shall be issued a motorcycle operator’s license restricted to the operation of three (3) wheeled motorcycles under KRS

186.447

; or

Two (2) wheeled motorcycle shall be issued a motorcycle operator’s license without the restriction identified in KRS

186.447

, and may operate both two (2) and three (3) wheeled motorcycles.

Any person whose intermediate license or operator’s license is denied, suspended, or revoked for cause shall apply for reinstatement at the termination of the period for which the license was denied, suspended, or revoked by submitting to the examination. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any person whose license was suspended for failure to meet the conditions described in KRS

186.411

when, within one (1) year of suspension, the driving privileges of such individuals are reinstated.

An applicant shall not use an autocycle for any road skills testing administered under the provisions of this section.

History.

2739m-33, 2739m-67: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 208, § 6; 1968, ch. 63, § 8; 1970, ch. 22, § 5; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 36, § 6; 1986, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 123, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 86, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 396, § 5, effective January 1, 2001; 2002, ch. 264, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 65, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 195, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 69, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 100, § 37, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 17, effective March 27, 2020; 2021 ch. 188, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

186.480.
Examination of applicants by Department of Kentucky State Police — Vision test to be administered in compliance with KRS 186.577 — Exemptions for certain applicants — Road skills test required for motorcycle operator’s license. [Effective July 1, 2024]

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall examine every applicant for an operator’s license as identified in KRS

186.635

, except as otherwise provided in this section. The examination shall be held in the county where the applicant resides unless:

The applicant is granted written permission by the Transportation Cabinet to take the examination in another county; or

The applicant is tested using a bioptic telescopic device.

The examination shall include a test of the applicant’s eyesight to ensure compliance with the visual acuity and visual field standards set forth in KRS

186.577

. The vision testing outlined in this subsection shall be administered under the provisions established in KRS

186.577

at, or prior to, the time of application. The examination shall also include a test of the applicant’s ability to read and understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic, the applicant’s knowledge of traffic laws, and an actual demonstration of the applicant’s ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to an applicant who:

At the time of application, holds a valid operator’s license from another state, provided that state affords a reciprocal exemption to a Kentucky resident; or

Is a citizen of the Commonwealth who has been serving in the United States military and has allowed his or her operator’s license to expire.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, an applicant for a motorcycle operator’s license shall be required to show his or her ability to operate a motorcycle. An applicant who successfully completes the skills portion of the test under this subsection on a:

Three (3) wheeled motorcycle shall be issued a motorcycle operator’s license restricted to the operation of three (3) wheeled motorcycles under KRS

186.447

; or

Two (2) wheeled motorcycle shall be issued a motorcycle operator’s license without the restriction identified in KRS

186.447

, and may operate both two (2) and three (3) wheeled motorcycles.

Any person whose intermediate license or operator’s license is denied, suspended, or revoked for cause shall apply for reinstatement at the termination of the period for which the license was denied, suspended, or revoked by submitting to the examination. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any person whose license was suspended for failure to meet the conditions described in KRS

186.411

when, within one (1) year of suspension, the driving privileges of such individuals are reinstated.

An applicant shall not use an autocycle for any road skills testing administered under the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

2739m-33, 2739m-67: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 208, § 6; 1968, ch. 63, § 8; 1970, ch. 22, § 5; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 36, § 6; 1986, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 123, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 86, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 396, § 5, effective January 1, 2001; 2002, ch. 264, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 65, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 195, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 69, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 100, § 37, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 17, effective March 27, 2020; 2021 ch. 188, § 2, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 126, § 2, effective July 1, 2024.

186.490.
Duties of the circuit clerk — Issuing offices to close by June 30, 2020.

The circuit clerk of each county shall continue to issue standard identity documents until the cabinet determines that a cabinet regional office can assume those duties. All circuit clerk issuing offices shall be closed by June 30, 2022.

The circuit clerk of each county that operates an office that issues standard identity credentials shall:

Comply with all rules and regulations issued by the cabinet under KRS

186.400

relating to his or her duties;

Act for the cabinet for the purpose of issuing temporary operator’s licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification cards;

Administer the oath required by KRS

186.412

and

186.4122

to the applicant without fee;

Report and remit monthly to the state all moneys collected during the preceding month and remit a copy of all applications taken by him during the same period to the Transportation Cabinet. Upon failure of any clerk to report and remit therefor more than seven (7) days after the due date, he shall pay, in addition to the amount due, a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount due. Penalties collected under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury as a p art of the revenue collected under KRS

186.531

; and

Keep adequate records of all moneys collected and remitted to the state.

History.

2739m-42, 2739m-44, 2739m-70: amend. Acts 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. X, § 12; 1958, ch. 60, § 5; 1968, ch. 63, § 4; 1970, ch. 22, § 6; 1980, ch. 188, § 309, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 367, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 100, § 19, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 18, effective March 27, 2020.

186.495.
Alphabetical index of operators’ licenses. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 79, § 2; 1968, ch. 63, § 5; 1970, ch. 22, § 7; 2007, ch. 85, § 196, effective June 26, 2007; repealed by 2017 ch. 100, § 39, effective January 1, 2019.

186.500.
Content of license certificate. [Repealed.]

186.510.
License to be in possession and to be shown on demand.

The licensee shall have his or her license in his or her immediate possession at all times when driving a motor vehicle and shall display it upon demand to the circuit clerk or examiner, a peace officer, a member of the Department of Kentucky State Police, or a field deputy or inspector of the Department of Vehicle Regulation or Transportation Cabinet or, pursuant to KRS

67A.075

or

83A.088

, a safety officer who is in the process of securing information to complete an accident report. It shall be a defense to any charge under this section if the person so charged produces in court an operator’s license, issued to him or her before his or her arrest and valid at the time of his or her arrest.

History.

2739m-46: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 127, § 6; 1966, ch. 255, § 171; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2), (9); 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 174, effective January 2, 1978; 1994, ch. 110, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 85, § 197, effective June 26, 2007.

186.520.
Duplicate license.

A person whose license has been legitimately lost or destroyed, shall apply to the Transportation Cabinet in order to make application for a duplicate license. The person shall furnish satisfactory proof by affidavit substantiating the loss or destruction when applying for a duplicate license.

The fee for a duplicate license shall be according to the schedule set forth in KRS

186.531

.

History.

2739m-45: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 138; 1958, ch. 60, § 6; 1972, ch. 135, § 1; 1976, ch. 173, § 1; 1994, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2017 ch. 100, § 20, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 19, effective March 27, 2020.

186.530.
Expiration of licenses — Renewal — Fee. [Repealed.]